fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-nôhpan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nôhpan / -ohpan- - ok : # -m animate dependent noun, lung	AEW NDA1
     # môhpan+N+A+D+PxX+Sg: môhpan
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nôhpan
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kôhpan
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nôhpaninân
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kôhpaninaw
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kôhpaniwâw
     
     # môhpan+N+A+D+PxX+Obv: môhpana
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: nôhpana
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kôhpana
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: nôhpaninâna
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Obv: kôhpaninawa
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kôhpaniwâwa

     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: ohpan
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: ohpaniwâwa
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: ohpaniyiwa


     # môhpan+N+A+D+PxX+Pl: môhpanak
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nôhpanak
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kôhpanak
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nôhpaninânak
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kôhpaninawak
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kôhpaniwâwak

     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: ohpana
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: ohpaniwâwa
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: ohpaniyiwa

     # môhpan+N+A+D+PxX+Loc: môhpanihk
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Loc: nôhpanihk
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kôhpanihk
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Loc: nôhpaninâhk
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kôhpaninâhk
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kôhpaniwâhk

     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Loc: ohpanihk
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Loc: ohpaniwâhk
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: ohpaniyihk

     # môhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+PxX+Sg:      [môhpanis,     môhpanisis]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nôhpanis,     nôhpanisis]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kôhpanis,     kôhpanisis]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nôhpanisinân, nôhpanisisinân]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kôhpanisinaw, kôhpanisisinaw]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kôhpanisiwâw, kôhpanisisiwâw]

     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv:    [ohpanisa,     ohpanisisa]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv:    [ohpanisiwâwa, ohpanisisiwâwa]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [ohpanisiyiwa, ohpanisisiyiwa]

     # môhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+PxX+Pl:      [môhpanisak,     môhpanisisak]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nôhpanisak,     nôhpanisisak]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kôhpanisak,     kôhpanisisak]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nôhpanisinânak, nôhpanisisinânak]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kôhpanisinawak, kôhpanisisinawak]
     nôhpan+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kôhpanisiwâwak, kôhpanisisiwâwak]
